Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 42.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201086-520.01
Information technology purchases;
standards; use of Network Nebraska; notice required; when.

Information technology
purchases made with state funds or local tax receipts by education-related
political subdivisions shall meet or exceed any applicable technical standards
established by the commission. The Chief Information Officer may bid for such
equipment and allow education-related political subdivisions to participate
in leasing or purchasing contracts. An education-related political subdivision
shall provide notice in writing, if required by guidelines established by
the University of Nebraska and the Chief Information Officer for participation
in Network Nebraska, to the distance education director of the Educational
Service Unit Coordinating Council, the University of Nebraska, and the Chief
Information Officer prior to the use of any new or additional equipment that
will impact the use of Network Nebraska by such education-related political
subdivision or other education-related political subdivisions.

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 42.
April 15, 2010